Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 34.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1034
Refunds; interest not allowable.

Interest shall
not be allowable on any refunds paid because of incentives earned under the
Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 34.